Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.800

Securities laws not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall impair, derogate from, or otherwise affect the authority or powers of the administrator under the securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, or the application of any provision thereof to any person or transaction subject thereto.

[ 1986 c 14 s 41.]